California, session 20252026, SB618.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 8386.8 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:8386.8.(a)Each electrical corporation shall automatically provide a reimbursement credit to all customers effected by a deenergization event in an amount equal to thirty dollars ($30) for every 24 hours that a customer experiences a deenergization event.(b)The reimbursement credit amount shall not be funded by ratepayer moneys.(c)The reimbursement credit shall be issued automatically to a customer’s billing statement within one billing cycle after the conclusion of the deenergization event.SECTION 1. Section 8386.9 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:8386.9. (a) Each electrical corporation shall file a postdeenergization event report with the commission following a deenergization event, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8386, that includes the duration of the deenergization event, the circuits affected, the number of customers impacted, and any other information required by the commission.(b) (1) Each electrical corporation shall include the cost to a customer of the interruption of electrical service, per affected customer, and the aggregated cost for all affected customers in a report filed pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) The commission, in a new or existing proceeding, shall develop a standardized methodology for calculating the cost to a customer of the interruption of electrical service that shall be used by an electrical corporation for a report filed pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) (1) The commission may assess a fine or penalty on an electrical corporation following its review of a deenergization event if the commission determines the electrical corporation violated deenergization protocols, commission rules, laws, or other requirements.(2) If the commission assesses a fine or penalty on an electrical corporation pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall consider the impact of the deenergization event on the electrical corporation’s customers and shall direct any revenues from the fine or penalty to automatic credits to those customers affected by the deenergization event.(3) The commission shall ensure that any fine or penalty assessed pursuant to this subdivision is recovered from the electrical corporation’s shareholders and not recovered from ratepayers.SEC. 2. Section 8387 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:8387. (a) Each local publicly owned electric utility and electrical cooperative shall construct, maintain, and operate its electrical lines and equipment in a manner that will minimize the risk of wildfire posed by those electrical lines and equipment.(b) (1) The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall, before January 1, 2020, prepare a wildfire mitigation plan. After January 1, 2020, a local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall prepare a wildfire mitigation plan annually and shall submit the plan to the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board on or before July 1 of that calendar year. Each local publicly owned electric utility and electrical cooperative shall update its plan annually and submit the update to the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board by July 1 of each year. At least once every three years, the submission shall be a comprehensive revision of the plan.(2) The wildfire mitigation plan shall consider as necessary, at minimum, all of the following:(A) An accounting of the responsibilities of persons responsible for executing the plan.(B) The objectives of the wildfire mitigation plan.(C) A description of the preventive strategies and programs to be adopted by the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative to minimize the risk of its electrical lines and equipment causing catastrophic wildfires, including consideration of dynamic climate change risks.(D) A description of the metrics the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative plans to use to evaluate the wildfire mitigation plan’s performance and the assumptions that underlie the use of those metrics.(E) A discussion of how the application of previously identified metrics to previous wildfire mitigation plan performances has informed the wildfire mitigation plan.(F) Protocols for disabling reclosers and deenergizing portions of the electrical distribution system that consider the associated impacts on public safety, and protocols related to mitigating the public safety impacts of those protocols, including impacts on critical first responders and on health and communication infrastructure.(G) Appropriate and feasible procedures for notifying a customer who may be impacted by the deenergizing of electrical lines. The procedures shall direct notification to all public safety offices, critical first responders, health care facilities, and operators of telecommunications infrastructure with premises within the footprint of potential deenergization for a given event.(H) Plans for vegetation management.(I) Plans for inspections of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s electrical infrastructure.(J) A list that identifies, describes, and prioritizes all wildfire risks, and drivers for those risks, throughout the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory. The list shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(i) Risks and risk drivers associated with design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s equipment and facilities.(ii) Particular risks and risk drivers associated with topographic and climatological risk factors throughout the different parts of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory.(K) Identification of any geographic area in the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory that is a higher wildfire threat than is identified in a commission fire threat map, and identification of where the commission should expand a high fire-threat district based on new information or changes to the environment.(L) A methodology for identifying and presenting enterprisewide safety risk and wildfire-related risk.(M) A statement of how the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative will restore service after a wildfire.(N) A description of the processes and procedures the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall use to do all of the following:(i) Monitor and audit the implementation of the wildfire mitigation plan.(ii) Identify any deficiencies in the wildfire mitigation plan or its implementation, and correct those deficiencies.(iii) Monitor and audit the effectiveness of electrical line and equipment inspections, including inspections performed by contractors, that are carried out under the plan, other applicable statutes, or commission rules.(O) Appropriate and feasible procedures for compensating a customer who may be impacted by the deenergizing of electrical lines.(3) The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall, on or before January 1, 2020, and not less than annually thereafter, present its wildfire mitigation plan in an appropriately noticed public meeting. The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall accept comments on its wildfire mitigation plan from the public, other local and state agencies, and interested parties, and shall verify that the wildfire mitigation plan complies with all applicable rules, regulations, and standards, as appropriate.(c) The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall contract with a qualified independent evaluator with experience in assessing the safe operation of electrical infrastructure to review and assess the comprehensiveness of its wildfire mitigation plan. The independent evaluator shall issue a report that shall be made available on the internet website of the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative, and shall present the report at a public meeting of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s governing board.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.